Utah statutes.
17B-2a-1008.   Subdistricts to become water conservancy districts.

Each water conservancy subdistrict, created and operating under the law in effect before April 30, 2007 and existing on April 30, 2007, shall, on that date, become a water conservancy district.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

